Utah statutes.
61-2c-301.   Prohibited conduct -- Violations of the chapter.
(1)  A person transacting the business of residential mortgage loans in this
state may not:
(a)  give or receive compensation or anything of value in exchange for a
referral of residential mortgage loan business;
(b)  charge a fee in connection with a residential mortgage loan transaction:
(i)  that is excessive; or
(ii)  if the person does not comply with Section 70D-2-305;
(c)  give or receive compensation or anything of value in exchange for a
referral of settlement or loan closing services related to a residential
mortgage loan transaction;
(d)  do any of the following to induce a lender to extend credit as part of a
residential mortgage loan transaction:
(i)  make a false statement or representation;
(ii)  cause false documents to be generated; or
(iii)  knowingly permit false information to be submitted by any party;
(e)  give or receive compensation or anything of value, or withhold or
threaten to withhold payment of an appraiser fee, to influence the independent
judgment of an appraiser in reaching a value conclusion in a residential
mortgage loan transaction, except that it is not a violation of this section
for a licensee to withhold payment because of a bona fide dispute regarding a
failure of the appraiser to comply with the licensing law or the Uniform
Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice;
(f)  violate or not comply with:
(i)  this chapter;
(ii)  an order of the commission or division; or
(iii)  a rule made by the division;
(g)  fail to respond within the required time period to:
(i)  a notice or complaint of the division; or
(ii)  a request for information from the division;
(h)  make false representations to the division, including in a licensure
statement;
(i)  for a residential mortgage loan transaction beginning on or after January
1, 2004, engage in the business of residential mortgage loans with respect to
the transaction if the person also acts in any of the following capacities
with respect to the same residential mortgage loan transaction:
(i)  appraiser;
(ii)  escrow agent;
(iii)  real estate agent;
(iv)  general contractor; or
(v)  title insurance agent;
(j)  order a title insurance report or hold a title insurance policy unless
the person provides to the title insurer a copy of a valid, current license
under this chapter;
(k)  engage in unprofessional conduct as defined by rule;
(l)  engage in an act or omission in transacting the business of residential
mortgage loans that constitutes dishonesty, fraud, or misrepresentation;
(m)  engage in false or misleading advertising;
(n) (i)  fail to account for monies received in connection with a residential
mortgage loan;
(ii)  use monies for a different purpose from the purpose for which the monies
are received; or
(iii)  except as provided in Subsection (4), retain monies paid for services
if the services are not performed;
(o)  fail, within 90 calendar days of a request from a borrower who has paid
for an appraisal, to give a copy of an appraisal ordered and used for a
transaction to the borrower;
(p)  engage in an act that is performed to:
(i)  evade this chapter; or
(ii)  assist another person to evade this chapter;
(q)  recommend or encourage default, delinquency, or continuation of an
existing default or delinquency, by a mortgage applicant on an existing
indebtedness before the closing of a residential mortgage loan that will
refinance all or part of the indebtedness;
(r)  in the case of the principal lending manager of an entity or a branch
office of an entity, fail to exercise reasonable supervision over the
activities of:
(i)  unlicensed staff; and
(ii)  a mortgage officer who is licensed with the principal lending manager;
(s)  pay or offer to pay an individual who does not hold a license under this
chapter for work that requires the individual to hold a license under this
chapter;
(t)  in the case of a dual licensed title licensee as defined in Section
31A-2-402:
(i)  provide a title insurance product or service without the approval
required by Section 31A-2-405; or
(ii)  knowingly provide false or misleading information in the statement
required by Subsection 31A-2-405(2); or
(u)  represent to the public that the person can or will perform any act of a
loan originator if that person is not licensed under this chapter because the
person is exempt under Subsection 61-2c-102(1)(f)(ii)(A), including through:
(i)  advertising;
(ii)  a business card;
(iii)  stationary;
(iv)  a brochure;
(v)  a sign;
(vi)  a rate list; or
(vii)  other promotional item.
(2)  Whether or not the crime is related to the business of residential
mortgage loans, it is a violation of this chapter for a licensee or a person
who is a certified education provider to do any of the following with respect
to a criminal offense that involves moral turpitude:
(a)  be convicted;
(b)  plead guilty or nolo contendere;
(c)  enter a plea in abeyance; or
(d)  be subjected to a criminal disposition similar to the ones described in
Subsections (2)(a) through (c).
(3)  A principal lending manager does not violate Subsection (1)(r) if:
(a)  in contravention of the principal lending manager's written policies and
instructions, an affiliated licensee of the principal lending manager
violates:
(i)  this chapter; or
(ii)  rules made by the division under this chapter;
(b)  the principal lending manager established and followed reasonable
procedures to ensure that affiliated licensees receive adequate supervision;
(c)  upon learning of a violation by an affiliated licensee, the principal
lending manager attempted to prevent or mitigate the damage;
(d)  the principal lending manager did not participate in or ratify the
violation by an affiliated licensee; and
(e)  the principal lending manager did not attempt to avoid learning of the
violation.
(4)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1)(n)(iii), a licensee may, upon compliance
with Section 70D-2-305, charge a reasonable cancellation fee for work done
originating a mortgage if the mortgage is not closed.
